District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-101.02

Emission and air control standards

Repealed.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 2(a), 32 DCR 562

History

Acid rain, research and plan, see 42 U.S.C. § 8901 et seq.
Air pollution prevention and control, Clean Air Act, see 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.
Clean Air Act, see 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.
Pollution Prevention Act of 1990, see 42 U.S.C. § 13101 et seq.
Stratospheric Ozone Protection, see 42 U.S.C. § 7671 et seq.
Sulfur dioxide, acid deposition control, air pollution prevention and control, see 42 U.S.C. § 7651 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., §§ 6-901 to 6-903.

Prior Codifications

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to DC Law 6-100, the “Litter Control Administration Act of 1985;” DC Law 6-42, the “Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985;” DC Law 5-165, the “DC Air Pollution Control Act of 1984;” DC Law 13-172, the “Rodent Control Act of 2000;” and DC Law 6-126, the “Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-5, February 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 911).

Delegation of Authority

Due to the codification of Title II of D.C. Law 20-135 as Part B of this subchapter, the existing sections of this chapter were designated as Part A.

Editor's Notes